Nebraska, session 109, LB162.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB162 LB162
2025 2025
Section 1. Sections 1 to 7 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Child Care Safety and Security Act.
Sec. 2. The Legislature finds that the safety and security of
children in child care and early education programs warrants the need for
emergency preparedness for, and response to, weather events, fires,
intruders, accidents, and other threats to a child's safety. It is
necessary that standards for emergency preparedness and response for
child care and early education programs be aligned with such standards in
elementary and secondary schools.
Sec. 3. For purposes of the Child Care Safety and Security Act:
(1) Child care and early education program means a program licensed
under the Child Care Licensing Act and which operates as a for-profit or
nonprofit organization under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
amended, the federal Head Start program, and the Early Head Start
program;
(2) Early childhood support agency means an organization that
provides support services to a child care and early education program;
(3) Emergency response notification system means an electronic
system that delivers alerts or other notifications during an emergency to
a targeted group of subscribers;
(4) Designee means a public school district, city or village, local
public health department, law enforcement agency, early childhood support
agency, or local emergency management agency that enters into a
memorandum of understanding as described in section 5 of this act; and
(5) Safety and reunification procedure means a standard which is
approved by the State Department of Education for the purpose of
emergency preparedness and response.
Sec. 4. (1) The Child Care Safety and Security Fund is created. The
fund shall be administered by the State Department of Education and shall
consist of money transferred by the Legislature. Any money in the fund
available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
-2-

LB162 LB162
2025 2025
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska
State Funds Investment Act.
(2) Subject to available appropriations, the department shall award
grants to educational service units on a competitive basis on behalf of
designees for emergency response notification systems, training, and
materials related to safety and reunification procedures.
Sec. 5. An educational service unit may apply to the State
Department of Education for a grant, using forms and in a manner
prescribed by the department, to provide funding to designees operating
within the boundaries of an educational service unit. To receive funding,
a designee shall enter into a memorandum of understanding with the
appropriate educational service unit in the designee's geographic area
for the purpose of funding qualifying projects as described in this
section. In order to qualify for a grant, the educational service unit
shall demonstrate to the department that:
(1) A designee is assigned, through a memorandum of understanding,
to administer the emergency response notification system for child care
and early education programs that opt into the notification system within
a defined geographic area. Such defined geographic area shall allow the
designee to reasonably respond to local area emergencies. Other programs
not required to be licensed under the Child Care Licensing Act within the
defined geographic area may subscribe to the emergency response
notification system. Funding amounts for designees under this subdivision
shall not exceed one thousand dollars per year;
(2) A security and safety plan approved by the department has been
provided by the designee which shall operate the emergency notification
system. Such security and safety plan shall include information on a
community response team to provide for reunification procedures;
(3) A designee is assigned, through a memorandum of understanding,
to distribute safety and reunification procedure materials for use in
facilities that care for children in child care and early education
-3-

LB162 LB162
2025 2025
programs. Funding amounts for designees under this subdivision shall not
exceed one thousand dollars per year; and
(4) A designee is assigned, through a memorandum of understanding,
to coordinate, administer, or provide for safety and reunification
procedure training to child care and early education programs including,
but not limited to, administrators, staff, children, and parents. Funding
amounts for designees under this subdivision shall not exceed one
thousand dollars per year.
Sec. 6. (1) On or before December 1 of each year, the State
Department of Education shall provide an electronic report to the Clerk
of the Legislature which shall include, but not be limited to:
(a) The number of designees that received grant funding under the
Child Care Safety and Security Act, including the type of organization,
the ages of children served by programs enrolled in the emergency
response notification system, the number of children served by such
programs, and the geographic locations of such programs;
(b) How grant funds were used;
(c) The average amount of grant funds received by designees broken
down by the number of children served; and
(d) The number of designees denied grant funding and the reasons for
each denial.
(2) The report shall not identify any child care and early education
program.
Sec. 7. The State Board of Education may adopt and promulgate rules
and regulations to carry out the Child Care Safety and Security Act.
-4-